Louisiana, session 2026, HB667.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:3158 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3158. Creation of commission; membership; qualifications; tenure
A. There is hereby created a commission to be known as the Caddo-Bossier
Parishes Port Commission. It shall be composed of nine members, who shall serve
without compensation, as follows:
(1)(a) Two of the commissioners shall be appointed by the governing
authority of the parish of Caddo as follows:
(i) One of the commissioners shall reside in the parish of Caddo outside of
the city limits of Shreveport.
(ii) One of the commissioners shall reside in the parish of Caddo within the
city limits of Shreveport.
(b) Any commissioner appointed pursuant to this Paragraph shall serve a
term of six years.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-276 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 667
(2) One of the commissioners shall be appointed by the governing authority
of the parish of Bossier.
(a) The commissioner shall reside in the parish of Bossier.
(b) The commissioner appointed pursuant to this Paragraph shall serve a
term of six years.
(3) Four of the commissioners shall be appointed by the governing authority
of the city of Shreveport as follows:
(a) Three commissioners shall reside within the city limits of Shreveport and
each shall serve a term of six years.
(b) One commissioner shall be at-large and reside within the city limits of
Shreveport and shall serve a term concurrent with the term of the mayor.
(4)(a) Two of the commissioners shall be appointed by the governing
authority of the city of Bossier City.
(b) Any commissioner appointed pursuant to this Paragraph shall reside
within the city limits of Bossier City and shall serve a term of six years.
B. A vacancy on the commission for any reason shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointments and for the unexpired term of office. Each
commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States and a qualified voter and
property taxpayer of the parish of Caddo or Bossier, as the case may be, and of the
state of Louisiana.
C. The governing authorities, in making appointments, shall endeavor to
provide for racial diversity of the board and to ensure that the racial proportion of the
appointees shall reflect the same racial proportion of the geographical area which
they represent. Except, the governing authority of the parish of Caddo, in making
appointments, shall endeavor to provide for racial diversity of the board and to
ensure that the racial proportion of their appointees shall reflect the same racial
proportion of the governing authority of the parish of Caddo.
D. The term of each commissioner serving on June 18, 2006, shall expire as
follows:
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-276 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 667
(a) The term of the commissioner appointed by the governing authority of
the parish of Caddo shall expire on June 30, 2007. His successors shall be appointed
pursuant to the provisions of Item (A)(1)(a)(i).
(b) The term of the commissioner appointed by the governing authority of
the parish of Bossier shall expire on February 15, 2009. His successors shall be
appointed pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (A)(2).
(c) The term of the commissioners appointed by the governing authority of
the city of Shreveport shall expire as follows:
(i) The term of the commissioner whose term began on April 1, 2003, and
would have expired on June 28, 2011, shall expire on such date. His successors shall
be appointed pursuant to the provisions of Subparagraph (A)(3)(a).
(ii) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on March
31, 2007, shall expire on such date. His successors shall be appointed pursuant to
the provisions of Item (A)(1)(a)(ii).
(iii) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on July
26, 2007, shall expire on June 30, 2007. His successors shall be appointed pursuant
to the provisions of Subparagraph (A)(3)(a).
(iv) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on July
27, 2009, shall expire on such date. His successors shall be appointed pursuant to
the provisions of Subparagraph (A)(3)(a).
(v) The commissioner whose term began July 18, 1997, and would have
expired on June 28, 2011, shall serve a term concurrent with the term of the mayor
who appointed him. His successors shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of
Subparagraph (A)(3)(b).
(d) The term of the commissioners appointed by the governing authority of
the city of Bossier City shall expire as follows:
(i) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on March
29, 2012, shall expire on such date. His successors shall be appointed pursuant to
the provisions of Paragraph (A)(4).
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-276 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 667
(ii) The term of the commissioner whose term would have expired on
February 16, 2007, shall expire on such date. His successors shall be appointed
pursuant to the provisions of Paragraph (A)(4).
(1) Commissioners shall be elected through nonpartisan elections conducted
on a parishwide basis. The election shall be held at the same time as the
gubernatorial primary election, beginning in 2027 and every four years thereafter.
(2) The administration of all elections held pursuant to this Section shall be
under the purview of the secretary of state and shall be conducted in accordance with
the Louisiana Election Code, including all applicable qualifying procedures and
filing fees.
(3) Each commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States, a qualified
voter of Caddo or Bossier parish, and a resident of the state of Louisiana.
B.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any member
serving on July 31, 2026, shall continue in his appointed role until December 31,
2027. Commissioners elected at the 2027 gubernatorial primary election shall
assume office on January 1, 2028.
(2) Commissioners shall serve for a term of four years and shall assume
office on January first following their election. In the event of a vacancy on the
commission for any reason, such vacancy shall be filled by a special election
conducted in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code.
(3) No commissioner shall serve more than three consecutive four-year
terms.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on August 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-276 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 667